Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 56 Postsecondary Student Financial Assistance

16-56-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to promote equal postsecondary educational opportunity by providing financial assistance to students who are restricted from participating in postsecondary education because of insufficient financial resources.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 3.

16-56-2.
General appropriation.

The general assembly shall appropriate annually a sum to provide postsecondary financial assistance. This sum may be supplemented from time to time by other sources of revenue including, but not limited to, federal programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. 28, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 425, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 40, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 30, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 20; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 52; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 4.

16-56-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 30, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

16-56-4.
Forms of assistance.

The forms of assistance and their purposes shall be as follows:

Need based grants, the purpose of which shall be to promote access and to support choice for financially needy students.

Need based scholarships, the purpose of which shall be to encourage and to reward the demonstration of superior ability and to promote access and choice for outstanding students who have financial need.

Need based work opportunities, the purpose of which shall be to promote work opportunities to financially needy students in order to fulfill those students’ self-help responsibilities by providing funds to agencies participating in the federal college work study program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 3.

16-56-5.
Annual evaluation.

An evaluation of this chapter shall be performed annually by the office of the postsecondary commissioner. The evaluation shall provide, as a minimum, a summary of the following information relating to award recipients: family income, student financial needs, basic educational opportunity grant awards, state awards, institutional based student assistance awards, federally guaranteed loans, other student assistance, institution attended, and other pertinent information.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 4.

16-56-6.
Need-based grants.

Amount of funds allocated. The commissioner of postsecondary education shall allocate annually the appropriation for need-based scholarships and grants. Of the total amount appropriated for need-based scholarship and grants, the lesser of twenty percent (20%) or one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) shall be distributed to qualified students attending participating, independent, non-profit, higher education institutions in Rhode Island. The remainder of funds shall be limited to public higher education institutions in Rhode Island including payments made pursuant to §

16-100-3(c)

. As part of the annual budget submission, the office of postsecondary commissioner shall include a plan of how the need-based scholarship and grant funds will be allocated to each public institution receiving funds pursuant to this chapter and how the funds will be distributed to students attending independent, non-profit institutions.

Eligibility of individuals. Eligibility for need-based grants and scholarships shall be determined by the office of the postsecondary commissioner.

Number and terms of awards. The number of awards to be granted in any one fiscal year shall be contingent upon the funds allocated to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 425, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 499, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 4; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 13.

16-56-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 425, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 499, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

16-56-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 402, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

16-56-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 402, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

16-56-10.
Rules and regulations.

In addition to the powers and duties prescribed in previous sections of this chapter, the office of the postsecondary commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations and take any other actions which will promote the full implementation of all provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 4.

16-56-11.
Transition.

No student shall be ineligible for financial assistance pursuant to this chapter for reasons of attendance at a postsecondary institution on or before July 1, 1978.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 52.

16-56-12.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of it to any person or circumstances is invalid, the invalidity shall not affect the other provisions of applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 238, § 3.

16-56-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 426, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 54, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.